Tennessee statutes. Title 45 Banks And Financial Institutions
Part 1

Department of Financial Institutions

45-1-101. Short title.

This chapter and chapter 2 of this title shall be known and may be cited as the “Tennessee Banking Act.”

Acts 1969, ch. 36, § 1 (1.101); T.C.A., § 45-101.

Cross-References. Funds transfers, title 47, ch. 4A.

Letters of credit, title 47, ch. 5.

Negotiable instruments, title 47, ch. 3.

Revocation, denial or suspension of professional, driver, and other licenses, to enforce child support obligations, title 36, ch. 5, part 7.

Tennessee Reciprocal Savings Institution Act, title 45, ch. 3, part 14.

Law Reviews.

Information Technology and Non-Legal Sanctions in Financing Transactions, 54 Vand. L. Rev. 1627 (2001).

Regulation by Hypothetical, 67 Vand. L. Rev. 1247 (2014).

45-1-102. Purpose — Standards for exercise of authority by commissioner — Rules of construction.

It is the underlying purpose of this chapter and chapter 2 of this title to provide the citizens of Tennessee with a sound system of state chartered banks by providing for and encouraging the development of the banks while restricting their activities to the extent necessary to safeguard the interests of depositors.

This underlying purpose includes, but is not limited to, providing for:

The sound conduct of the business of banks subject to this chapter and chapter 2 of this title;

The conservation of their assets;

The maintenance of adequate reserves against deposits;

The opportunity for banks subject to this chapter and chapter 2 of this title to compete with other businesses including, but not limited to, other financial organizations existing under the laws of this and other states, the United States and foreign countries;

The opportunity for banks to serve the citizens of this state by improving and expanding their services and facilities and the opportunity for banks to participate in and promote the economic progress of Tennessee and the United States;

The opportunity for the management of banks to exercise business judgment in conducting the affairs of their institutions; and

Modernization and simplification of the law governing banking by providing that banks subject to this chapter and chapter 2 of this title shall have all the rights and powers granted corporations for profit by the Tennessee Business Corporation Act, compiled in title 48, chapters 11-27, except for the rights and powers withheld by those chapters or by rule or regulation of the commissioner of financial institutions.

It is not a purpose of this chapter and chapter 2 of this title to restrict the activities of banks for the purpose of protecting any person, as hereinafter defined, from competition from banks, and this chapter and chapter 2 of this title do not confer any right or cause of action upon any competitor.

The purposes of this chapter and chapter 2 of this title shall constitute standards to be observed by the commissioner of financial institutions in the commissioner's exercise of authority under this chapter and chapter 2 of this title, and shall constitute rules of construction in all matters of construction and application of those chapters.

Acts 1969, ch. 36, § 1 (1.102); 1973, ch. 294, § 6; T.C.A., § 45-102; Acts 1994, ch. 551, § 19.

Attorney General Opinions. The general power to conduct a banking business includes the power to prevent fraud by requiring customers or other individuals who wish to do business with a bank to provide a fingerprint for identification purposes, OAG 01-060, 2001 Tenn. AG LEXIS 52 (4/17/01).

45-1-103. General definitions.

As used in this chapter and chapter 2 of this title, unless the context otherwise requires:

“Act as a fiduciary” or “acting as a fiduciary” means to act in the capacity of a fiduciary as defined in § 35-2-102;

“Action,” in the sense of a judicial proceeding, includes recoupment, counterclaim, setoff, suit in equity and any other proceedings in which rights are determined;

“Bank” means any person, as hereinafter defined, doing a banking business subject to the laws of this or any other jurisdiction and, for the purposes of supervision, examination and liquidation, includes industrial investment companies and industrial banks authorized by chapter 5 of this title;

“Branch” with respect to a state bank means any place of business separated from the main office of a bank at which deposits are received, or checks paid or money lent;

“Commissioner” means the commissioner of financial institutions;

“Community” means a city, town, or incorporated village in this state, or where not within any of the foregoing, a trade area in this state;

“Company” includes a bank, trust company, corporation, partnership, association, business or other trust, or similar business entity;

“Department” means the department of financial institutions;

“Deposit” means a deposit of money, bonds or other things of value, creating a debtor-creditor relationship;

“Depository institution” means any company included for any purpose within any of the definitions of insured depository institution, as set forth in 12 U.S.C. § 1813(c)(2) and (3);

“Executive officer,” when referring to a bank, means any officer designated as such in the bylaws and includes, whether or not so designated, the president, any vice president, the treasurer, the cashier, the comptroller and the secretary, or any officer who performs the duties appropriate to those officers;

“Fiduciary record” means a matter written, transcribed, recorded, received or otherwise in the possession or control of a trust institution, whether in physical or electromagnetic form, that is necessary to preserve information concerning an act or event relevant to an account or a client of a trust institution;

“Foreign bank” means a foreign bank, as defined in the International Banking Act of 1978 § 1(b)(7) (12 U.S.C. § 3101(7));

“Good faith” means honesty in fact in the conduct or transaction concerned;

“Home state” means:

With respect to a federally chartered trust institution and a foreign bank, the state in which the institution maintains its principal office; and

With respect to any other trust institution, the state that chartered the institution;

“Home state regulator” means the bank supervisory agency with primary responsibility for chartering and supervising an out-of-state trust institution;

“In operation” or “operating” means that:

A charter has been issued to a bank by the United States comptroller of the currency or a certificate of authority has been issued by the commissioner; or

A bank has all appropriate approvals to accept insured deposits from the public;

“Item” means any instrument for the payment of money, even though not negotiable, but does not include money;

“New trust office” means a trust office located in a host state that:

Is originally established by the trust institution as a trust office; and

Does not become a trust office of the trust institution as a result of:

The acquisition of another trust institution or trust office of another trust institution; or

A merger, consolidation, or conversion involving the trust institution or trust office;

“Office,” with respect to a trust institution, means the principal office or a trust office, but not a branch;

“Officer,” when referring to a bank, means any person designated as such in the bylaws and includes, whether or not so designated, any executive officer, the chair of the board of directors, the chair of the executive committee and any trust officer, assistant vice president, assistant treasurer, assistant cashier, assistant comptroller, assistant trust officer, or any person who performs the duties appropriate to those offices;

“Person” means an individual, corporation, firm, trust, estate, partnership, joint venture, or association;

“Principal office” with respect to a:

State trust company means a location registered with the commissioner as the state trust company's home office at which:

The state trust company does business;

The state trust company keeps its corporate books; and

At least one (1) executive officer of the state trust company maintains an office; or

Trust institution, other than a state trust company, means its principal place of business in the United States;

“Reason to know” means that, upon the information available, a person of ordinary intelligence in the particular business, or of the superior intelligence or experience that the person in question may have, would infer that the fact in question exists or that there is such a substantial chance of its existence that, if exercising reasonable care with reference to the matter in question, conduct would be predicated upon the assumption of its possible existence;

“Savings association” means an association as defined and operating under chapter 3 of this title or under the laws of the United States;

“State bank” means any bank chartered by this state;

“State trust company” means a corporation or limited liability company organized or reorganized under the Tennessee Banking Act, compiled in this chapter and chapter 2 of this title, whose purposes and powers are limited to fiduciary purposes and power, including a trust company previously organized under the laws of this state;

“State trust institution” means a trust institution having its principal office in this state;

“Subsidiary corporation” means any corporation, all or part of the stock of which is owned by a bank principally for the purpose of participating in the active management of the business of the corporation as distinguished from the purpose of deriving profit from the appreciation in value of the stock or from dividends paid on the stock;

“Terms” when referring to loans means maturities, security for, rates of interest and other charges;

“Trust company” means a state trust company or any other company chartered to act as a fiduciary that is neither a depository institution nor a foreign bank;

“Trust institution” means a depository institution, foreign bank, state bank or trust company authorized to act as a fiduciary;

“Trust office” means an office, other than the principal office, at which a trust institution is authorized by the commissioner to act as a fiduciary; and

“Unauthorized trust activity” means:

A company, other than one identified in chapter 2, part 10 of this title, acting as a fiduciary within this state;

A trust institution acting as a fiduciary in this state at any location that is not its principal office, trust office or branch; or

An out-of-state trust institution acting as a fiduciary in this state in violation of an order issued by the commissioner.

Acts 1969, ch. 36, § 1 (1.103); 1973, ch. 294, §§ 6, 8; T.C.A., § 45-103; Acts 1983, ch. 274, § 2; 1993, ch. 22, § 1; 1996, ch. 768, § 3; 1999, ch. 112, § 1; 2014, ch. 642, § 1.

Compiler's Notes. Acts 1996, ch. 768, which amended this section, is known and may be cited as the Bank Reform Act of 1996.

For the Preamble to the act concerning the market for trust and trust services, please refer to Acts 2014, ch. 642.

45-1-104. Department to execute laws.

The department, created by §4-3-101, is charged with the execution of all laws relative to persons doing or engaged in a banking or other business as provided in this title, except for pawnbrokers covered by chapter 6 of this title.

Acts 1969, ch. 36, § 1 (2.101); impl. am. Acts 1971, ch. 137, § 1; modified; T.C.A., §45-1-104 Acts 1983, ch. 274, § 3; 1995, ch. 186, § 16; 2005, ch. 440, § 17.

Cross-References. Department of financial institutions, creation, §4-3-101.

Law Reviews.

Selected Tennessee Legislation of 1983 (N. L. Resener, J. A. Whitson, K. J. Miller), 50 Tenn. L. Rev. 785 (1983).

45-1-105. Commissioner, deputy and assistant commissioners — Qualifications — Vacancy.

The department will have as its chief executive officer a commissioner who will be appointed by the governor as commissioner of financial institutions, and who shall have the same official status as all other commissioners. The commissioner shall hold office for the term of office of the governor except the commissioner may be removed from office by the governor for cause.

The commissioner shall be a person of good character with at least five (5) years of experience in the theory and practice of bank management, three (3) years of which must have been in a full-time management or regulatory capacity. No person under thirty (30) years of age is eligible for appointment as commissioner.

With the consent of the governor, the commissioner has the power to appoint a deputy commissioner and one (1) assistant commissioner for each division within the department who shall serve at the will of the commissioner.

The deputy commissioner and assistant commissioners shall be persons of good character and have a minimum of three (3) years experience in the theory and practice of banking, or in the function and operation of credit unions in the case of the assistant commissioner for the credit union division, or in the function and operation of a financial institution in the case of the assistant commissioner for the compliance division, all of which must have been in a full-time management or regulatory capacity. For the purpose of this subsection (b), “financial institution” means any institution subject to the commissioner's jurisdiction and includes similar entities regulated by any other state or federal regulatory agency.

If the office of the commissioner is vacant, or if the commissioner is absent and unable to act, the governor may designate the deputy commissioner to be acting commissioner. If both the office of the commissioner and the office of the deputy commissioner are vacant or both are unable to act, the governor may designate one (1) of the assistant commissioners as acting commissioner.

Acts 1913, ch. 20, § 1; Shan., § 3273a14; Code 1932, § 5940; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 45-102; Acts 1973, ch. 294, §§ 10, 13; modified; T.C.A., §§ 45-106, 45-125; Acts 1983, ch. 274, § 4; 1993, ch. 22, §§ 2, 3; 2004, ch. 747, § 17.

Cross-References. Commissioner of financial institutions, appointment and term, §§4-3-111,4-3-112.

Law Reviews.

State Regulation of Bank Holding Companies and the Future of Interstate Banking: A Tennessee Perspective (Colman B. Hoffman and Kathryn R. Edge), 51 Tenn. L. Rev. 383 (1984).

45-1-106. Salary of commissioner.

The commissioner shall receive an annual salary as provided in §8-23-101, to be paid monthly in the same manner as the salaries of other state officers are paid.

Acts 1913, ch. 20, § 1; Shan., § 3273a16; Acts 1927, ch. 30, § 7; Code 1932, § 5941; Acts 1949, ch. 38, § 1; C. Supp. 1950, § 5941; impl. am. Acts 1955, ch. 193, § 1; impl. am. Acts 1961, ch. 183, § 1; impl. am. Acts 1963, ch. 261, § 1; impl. am. Acts 1965, ch. 252, § 1; impl. am. Acts 1972, ch. 526, § 6; Acts 1973, ch. 294, § 6; T.C.A., § 45-107.

Code Commission Notes.

For the fiscal year county officials salary schedule, see the County Technical Assistance Service website at http://www.ctas.tennessee.edu.

45-1-107. Powers and duties of commissioner.

In addition to other powers conferred by this title, the commissioner has the power to:

Interpret this chapter and chapter 2 of this title, and regulate banking practices thereunder;

Restrict the withdrawal of deposits from all or one (1) or more state banks where the commissioner finds that extraordinary circumstances make the restriction necessary for the proper protection of depositors in the affected institutions;

Authorize a state bank to participate in a public agency hereafter created under the laws of this state or of the United States, the purpose of which is to afford advantages or safeguards to banks or to depositors and to comply with all requirements and conditions imposed upon the participants;

Order any person to cease violating a provision of this title or lawful regulation issued under this title;

Order any person to cease and desist from engaging in any unsafe or unsound banking practice when the practice is likely to cause insolvency or dissipation of assets or earnings of a state bank or is likely to otherwise seriously prejudice the interests of the depositors of a state bank; and

Bring an action in the chancery court of Davidson County to enjoin any act or practice in or from this state that constitutes a violation of any provision of law or any rule or order that the department has the duty to execute pursuant to § 45-1-104. The court may not require the commissioner to post a bond in bringing the action. Upon a proper showing by the commissioner, the court shall grant a permanent or temporary injunction, restraining order, writ of mandamus, disgorgement, or other proper equitable relief including the recovery by the commissioner of costs and attorney fees. Further, to the extent that this subdivision (a)(6) does not conflict with other provisions of this title, a receiver or conservator may be appointed for the defendant or the defendant's assets.

The commissioner may remove a director, trustee, officer or employee of a state bank who becomes ineligible to hold the position or who, after receipt of an order to cease under subsection (a), violates this title or a lawful regulation or order issued under this title, or who is dishonest. It is a criminal offense against the state for any such persons, after receipt of a removal order, to perform any duty or exercise any power of any state bank for a period of three (3) years. A removal order shall specify the grounds of removal and a copy of the order shall be sent to the bank concerned.

Notice and opportunity for a hearing shall be provided in advance of any of the foregoing actions in this section taken by the commissioner, except the formulation of regulations of general application. In cases involving extraordinary circumstances requiring immediate action, the commissioner may take the action but shall promptly afford a subsequent hearing upon application to rescind the action taken.

The commissioner may, on petition of any interested person and after hearing, issue a declaratory order with respect to the applicability to any person, property or state of facts under this title or a rule issued by the commissioner. The order shall bind the commissioner and all parties to the proceeding on the state of facts alleged unless it is modified or reversed by a court. A declaratory order may be reviewed and enforced in the same manner as other orders of the commissioner, but the refusal to issue a declaratory order shall not be reviewable.

In addition to other powers conferred by this title, the commissioner has power to require a state bank to:

Maintain its accounts in accordance with regulations that the commissioner prescribes, having regard to the size of the organization;

Observe methods and standards that the commissioner prescribes for determining the value of various types of assets;

Charge off the whole or part of an asset that at the time of the commissioner's action could not lawfully be acquired;

Write down an asset to its market value;

Record liens and security in property or at the option of the bank, insure against losses from not recording;

Obtain a financial statement from a prospective borrower to the extent that the bank can do so;

Search, or obtain insurance of, the title to real estate taken as security;

Maintain adequate insurance against other risks that the commissioner determines to be necessary and appropriate for the protection of depositors and the public; and

Call a special meeting of the shareholders.

The commissioner has the power to subpoena witnesses, compel their attendance, require the production of evidence, administer an oath and examine any person under oath in connection with any subject relating to duty imposed upon or a power vested in the commissioner. These powers shall be enforced by a court of competent jurisdiction of the county in which the hearing is held.

No person shall be subjected to any civil or criminal liability for any act or omission to act in good faith in reliance upon a subsisting order, regulation or definition of the commissioner, notwithstanding a subsequent decision by a court invalidating the order, regulation or definition.

The commissioner is granted the power to enact reasonable substantive and procedural rules to carry out the purposes of any and all chapters within the commissioner's regulatory authority as conferred by law. This power shall specifically include, but not be limited to, the authority to establish a schedule of fees to be charged by the department relative to notifications or applications to be reviewed by the department. The promulgation shall be done in conformity with the Uniform Administrative Procedures Act, compiled in title 4, chapter 5.

The commissioner may accept payments to the department by credit card, debit card, electronic funds transfer, electronic check or other electronic means. The commissioner may adopt reasonable policies and rules governing the manner of acceptance of such payments.

The commissioner may enter into appropriate agreements with card issuers or other appropriate parties as needed to facilitate the acceptance of payments authorized under this subsection (i). The commissioner may impose and collect a convenience fee from any person making payment by credit card, debit card, electronic funds transfer, electronic check or other electronic means in order to offset the actual administrative fees and costs incurred by the department for accepting or processing such payments. Notwithstanding any law to the contrary, the convenience fee shall be charged in addition to all other fees, penalties, taxes and costs required by law.

The commissioner also may enter into appropriate agreements with third-party service providers for the acceptance and processing of payments made by credit card, debit card, electronic funds transfer, electronic check or other electronic means. Such agreements may authorize third-party service providers to impose and collect a convenience fee from persons making such payments.

When a person elects to make a payment to the department by credit card, debit card, electronic funds transfer, electronic check or other electronic means and a convenience fee is imposed and collected as authorized by this subsection (i), the payment of the convenience fee shall be deemed voluntary and shall not be refundable.

Acts 1969, ch. 36, § 1 (2.012); impl. am. Acts 1971, ch. 137, § 2; Acts 1973, ch. 294, § 12; 1975, ch. 59, § 1; 1978, ch. 516, § 1; T.C.A., § 45-108; Acts 1992, ch. 658, § 1; 1993, ch. 130, § 1; 1994, ch. 551, § 1; 1996, ch. 562, § 2; 2001, ch. 54, §§ 1, 2; 2013, ch. 102, § 1.

Code Commission Notes.

Pursuant to §39-11-111, when the performance or nonperformance of any act is made criminal by statute, and no penalty, punishment or forfeiture for the violation of that statute is imposed, the doing of the act is a misdemeanor. The criminal offense in this section has been designated as a Class A misdemeanor by authority of §40-35-110, which provides that an offense designated a misdemeanor without specification as to category is a Class A misdemeanor. See also §39-11-114.

Compiler's Notes. Acts 1993, ch. 130, § 2 deletes (h), effective July 1, 1996.

Acts 1996, ch. 562, § 2 deleted Acts 1993, ch. 130, § 2, which provided that (h) would expire on July 1, 1996.

45-1-108. Review of commissioner's orders — Enforcement.

A person who is aggrieved by an order of the commissioner issued pursuant to § 45-1-107 is entitled to judicial review as provided in the Uniform Administrative Procedures Act, compiled in title 4, chapter 5. A person who is aggrieved and directly affected by an order of the commissioner issued pursuant to other provisions of this title may seek judicial review as provided in title 27, chapter 9, except that judicial review of orders issued pursuant to chapter 5 of this title shall be governed by the Uniform Administrative Procedures Act.

In the event a person does not comply with an order issued pursuant to § 45-1-107, the commissioner may petition a chancery court having jurisdiction to seek injunctive relief to compel compliance with the order. The power is conferred and the duty is imposed upon the several chancery courts, in all proper cases, to award injunctive relief; provided, that the order issued by the commissioner shall not be reviewable in a proceeding initiated under this subsection (b).

In lieu of the procedure set forth in subsection (b), the commissioner may assess a civil penalty of not more than five hundred dollars ($500) per day against any bank or other person who violates an order issued pursuant to § 45-1-107 for each day during which the violation has occurred and continues. The maximum aggregate civil penalty assessed against a bank and any other person participating in the violation, however, shall not exceed five hundred dollars ($500) per day for each proceeding. In determining the amount of the penalty, the commissioner shall consider the appropriateness of the penalty with respect to the size of the financial resources and good faith of the person charged, the gravity of the violation, and other matters that justice may require. The person shall be afforded an opportunity for hearing upon request made within ten (10) days of the issuance of the notice of assessment. The commissioner's decision after a hearing or otherwise shall constitute a final order and may be reviewed in accordance with subsection (a); provided, that the original order shall not be reviewable in a proceeding initiated under this subsection (c).

Acts 1973, ch. 294, § 18; T.C.A., § 45-126; Acts 1981, ch. 24, § 1; 1983, ch. 274, § 5.

Law Reviews.

Justiciability in Tennessee, Part Two: Standing (Barbara Kritchevsky), 15 Mem. St. U.L. Rev. 179 (1985).

45-1-109. Oaths of office.

The commissioner shall, within fifteen (15) days from the time of notice of the appointment, take and subscribe to the constitutional oath of office.

In addition, the commissioner, examiners and other employees, before entering upon discharge of their duties, shall take and subscribe to an oath to faithfully and impartially perform the duties of their respective offices and to keep secret all information acquired by them in the discharge of their duties except as may be otherwise required by this chapter and chapter 2 of this title or otherwise by law. Willful violation of this oath is declared to be a criminal offense.

The oath of the commissioner shall be filed with the secretary of state. The oaths of other employees of the department shall be filed with the commissioner.

Acts 1969, ch. 36, § 1 (2.104); 1973, ch. 294, § 14; T.C.A., § 45-109; Acts 1993, ch. 22, §§ 4-6.

Code Commission Notes.

Pursuant to §39-11-111, when the performance or nonperformance of any act is made criminal by statute, and no penalty, punishment or forfeiture for the violation of that statute is imposed, the doing of the act is a misdemeanor. The criminal offense in this section has been designated as a Class A misdemeanor by authority of §40-35-110, which provides that an offense designated a misdemeanor without specification as to category is a Class A misdemeanor. See also §39-11-114.

45-1-110. [Reserved.]

Neither the commissioner nor any other employee of the department shall be liable in any civil action for damages for any act done or omitted in good faith in performing the duties of the person's office.

Acts 1969, ch. 36, § 1 (2.106); 1973, ch. 294, § 6; T.C.A., § 45-111.

45-1-112. Official seal.

The secretary of state shall provide the commissioner with an official seal. Every paper executed by the commissioner, in pursuance of any authority conferred on the commissioner by law and sealed with the official seal, shall be received in evidence, and may be recorded in any proper recording office in this state, in the same manner and with the same effect as a deed regularly acknowledged or proven.

Acts 1969, ch. 36, § 1 (2.107); 1973, ch. 294, § 6; T.C.A., § 45-112.

45-1-113. Office facilities.

The governor shall assign to the commissioner a suitable room or rooms for conducting the business of the department, and this department shall be furnished with the necessary furniture, stationery, lights, and other proper conveniences and clerical assistants in the same manner as is furnished to other state departments.

Acts 1969, ch. 36, § 1 (2.108); 1973, ch. 294, § 6; T.C.A., § 45-113.

45-1-114. Removal of commissioner from office — Causes — Procedure.

The commissioner may be removed from office for neglect of duty, malfeasance, misfeasance, extortion or corruption in office, incompetency, or intemperance in the use of intoxicating liquors or narcotics to such an extent, in view of the dignity of the office and the importance of its duties, as to render the commissioner unfit for the discharge of the duties, or for any offense involving moral turpitude while in office committed under color of or connected with the office.

Acts 1913, ch. 20, § 1; Shan., § 3273a18; Code 1932, § 5943; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 45-108; Acts 1973, ch. 249, §§ 6, 15; T.C.A., § 45-114.

Cross-References. Disclosing condition of bank, its depositors or debtors, §45-2-1713.

45-1-115. Divisions within department — Classification and salaries of department positions.

There are created within the department the following divisions:

The bank examination division;

The bank charter and branch application division;

The credit union division;

The administrative and support services division; and

The industrial loan and thrift companies division.

The commissioner is authorized, with the consent of the governor, to combine, consolidate or abolish any of these divisions, or to create new divisions that are necessary to carry out the duties imposed upon the commissioner and the department.

All positions in the department, with the exception of the commissioner, shall be classified by the commissioner according to the nature of the duties to be performed and the minimum qualifications for appointment, subject to § 45-1-105(b) and this section. The commissioner, having regard for the nature of the services to be performed and the salaries paid for similar work elsewhere, shall establish a salary range for each class of positions and within the salary range shall provide for recognition of professionalism and efficiency of service and for length of service.

Acts 1973, ch. 294, § 13; T.C.A., § 45-125; Acts 1983, ch. 274, § 6.

45-1-116. Examiners — Employment and duties.

The commissioner may, from time to time, if necessary, employ examiners to aid the commissioner in the discharge of official duties, and the examiners shall perform the duties the commissioner assigns them.

Acts 1969, ch. 36, § 1 (2.102); 1973, ch. 294, § 6; T.C.A., § 45-115.

Cross-References. Examination of banks and reports, title 45, ch. 2, part 16.

Violations of banking laws, title 45, ch. 2, part 17.

45-1-117.
Banking interests of employees of department — Criminal history records check.

No officer or employee of the department, except as provided in this title, shall receive, directly or indirectly, any payment or gratuity from any institutions regulated by the department, or be indebted to any state institutions regulated by the department, or engage in the negotiation of loans for others with the institutions regulated by the department. This provision shall not prohibit any employee from being a depositor or a lessor of safe deposit boxes on the same terms as are available to the public generally nor being indebted to any institution regulated by the department:

Upon a mortgage loan upon the residence of the mortgagor;

Upon any evidence of indebtedness transferred to any institution regulated by the department in the regular course of business by a seller of consumer goods or services purchased by the employee; or

Pursuant to any revolving credit arrangement offered to the employee upon the same terms as are available to the public generally.

A violation of subdivision (a)(1) is a criminal offense.

The commissioner, or any other employee of the department, shall not hold office or position in, have any indirect pecuniary interest in, or directly or indirectly own shares or securities issued by an institution supervised by the department, except that the commissioner may continue to own shares or securities issued by an institution that are owned on the date of the commissioner's appointment and all shares or security distributed by the institution and received by the commissioner on account of the shares or securities so owned.

A violation of subdivision (b)(1) is a criminal offense.

In the event of ownership of shares or securities by the commissioner, the commissioner shall disclose the ownership, amount and date of acquisition of the shares or securities in writing to the state treasurer immediately after the commissioner's appointment and shall not during the commissioner's term of office participate in any decision or take any action concerning an institution in which the commissioner owns the shares or securities other than actions or decisions generally applicable to institutions or classes of institutions.

The prohibitions of this section do not apply to employees of the department who hold clerical or support staff positions as determined by the commissioner.

Notwithstanding subsections (a)-(d), the commissioner has the authority by rule or by policy to determine what situations are material to the maintenance of regulatory independence and shall establish appropriate exceptions for those situations subject to this section where, by actions beyond the employee's control, there is no intent by the employee to circumvent this section. In so doing, the commissioner shall establish the circumstances under which covered department employees must be recused from official duties and has the authority to define the terms of this section. In establishing these standards, the commissioner shall consider the ethical standards established by other state or federal regulators. Nothing in this subsection (e) shall apply to the requirements otherwise imposed on the commissioner.

As a condition of employment with the department, the commissioner is authorized to require an applicant to provide the department or a duly authorized state contractor with a fingerprint sample in a form acceptable to the commissioner, as well as consent to a criminal history records check. Any criminal history records check conducted under this subdivision (f)(1) shall be conducted by the Tennessee bureau of investigation or the federal bureau of investigation, or both, and the results of the check shall be forwarded to the commissioner. The department shall pay the reasonable costs incurred in conducting the criminal history records check. The commissioner shall by rule or by policy determine what classes of applicants shall submit to a fingerprint criminal history records check and what officers or employees of the department shall have access to the results of the criminal history records check.

Subdivision (f)(1) shall not apply to applicants for clerical or support staff positions as determined by the commissioner.

The department shall maintain the confidentiality of all criminal history records information received pursuant to this subsection (f).

Acts 1969, ch. 36, § 1 (2.109); 1973, ch. 294, § 6; T.C.A., § 45-116; Acts 1983, ch. 274, § 7; 1993, ch. 25, § 1; 2001, ch. 54, § 3; 2009, ch. 499, § 9.

Code Commission Notes.

Pursuant to §39-11-111, when the performance or nonperformance of any act is made criminal by statute, and no penalty, punishment or forfeiture for the violation of that statute is imposed, the doing of the act is a misdemeanor. The criminal offense in this section has been designated as a Class A misdemeanor by authority of §40-35-110, which provides that an offense designated a misdemeanor without specification as to category is a Class A misdemeanor. See also §39-11-114.

Cross-References. Confidentiality of public records, §10-7-504.